Wyoming, session 2025, SF0087.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 34-1-159 is created to read:

34-1-159. Prescriptive easement for electricity
delivery.

(a) As used in this section:
SF0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0320

(i) "Delivery" means the distribution or
transmission of electricity;

(ii) "Electric utility" means any person,
including cooperative electric utilities that perform any
of the functions specified in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(C), that
is authorized to engage in business in Wyoming and that is
primarily engaged in the generation, transmission or sale
of electric energy. "Electric utility" shall not include
any electric utility owned or operated by a city or town;

(iii) "Electricity user" means a person or the
person's predecessor that receives or received electricity
from a public utility or that is or was a member or
customer of a public utility;

(iv) "Public utility" means as defined by W.S.
37-1-101(a)(vi);

(v) "System" means the physical structures,
including overhead power lines and underground power lines
SF0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0320
and appurtenant structures, that convey electricity from a
public utility to an electricity user.

(b) A prescriptive easement for an electric utility's
delivery system shall be established if the electric
utility has used and maintained the delivery system for a
period of not less than five (5) years during which the use
has been:

(i) Continuous and uninterrupted, consistent
with the historical and traditional use by the electric
utility of the delivery system. A temporary change of use,
cessation of use or de-energization for a period not
exceeding one (1) continuous year shall not be deemed an
interruption under this paragraph;

(ii) Above ground or, if not above ground,
clearly marked;

(iii) Without the written consent or permission
from the owners of the property over which the prescriptive
easement is claimed;

SF0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0320
(iv) In the public interest.

(c) The holder of a prescriptive easement established
under this section:

(i) Shall provide the landowner, at the address
listed for the landowner in the county assessor's records,
notice in writing of the intent to file a prescriptive
easement not less than thirty (30) days before recording
the easement. For purposes of this paragraph, notice is
effective upon mailing or hand delivery;

(ii) May record a notice describing the
prescriptive easement consistent with the requirements of
W.S. 34-1-141 in the office of the county clerk in the
county in which the prescriptive easement or a portion
thereof is located;

(iii) May access, use, maintain, replace,
rebuild, change or repair the delivery system and
surrounding area located within the easement in accordance
with law. Maintenance, as used in this section, shall
include the right of the holder of the prescriptive
SF0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0320
easement to remove incompatible vegetation and to
temporarily remove infrastructure in or spanning the
system, provided that:

(A) Before the temporary removal for
maintenance purposes of infrastructure that a landowner
uses for ingress or egress, the holder of the prescriptive
easement shall provide reasonable written notice given the
extent and estimated time for maintenance but in no case
shall notice be provided less than seventy-two (72) hours
before any temporary removal;

(B) Any temporary removal of a landowner's
infrastructure for the purpose of delivery system
maintenance shall be reasonable and minimize any burden on
the landowner. The holder of the prescriptive easement
shall replace the landowner's infrastructure in a timely
manner in consultation with the landowner or, if
replacement is not possible or if the landowner and the
holder agree, the holder of the easement may pay for the
replacement of infrastructure. The holder shall pay the
landowner for any direct monetary damages suffered by the
SF0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0320
landowner as a result of the holder's access to the
prescriptive easement.

(d) The width of a prescriptive easement established
under this section for a delivery system shall be based on
the size of the delivery system's physical structures and
in accordance with the standards of the electric utility
industry and shall:

(i) Be of a reasonable width sufficient to
utilize equipment suitable for the operation and
maintenance of the delivery system;

(ii) Be from the center line of the delivery
system, but may vary from each side of the center line as
circumstances require to provide for safe and efficient
delivery system operation, including consideration for the
size of the equipment, placement of equipment or material,
topography, height of surrounding vegetation and voltage of
the system.

Section 2.

SF0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0320
(a) Nothing in this act shall be construed to:

(i) Interfere with, impair or modify any
existing easement or property right, including an easement
for electricity delivery established by written instrument
or other law;

(ii) Alter any rights or duties associated with
any existing easement or property right, as established by
law;

(iii) Preclude the acquisition or establishment
of a prescriptive easement under existing common-law
principles.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0087